District of Columbia statutes.
42-3402.05a

Application fees.

(a)

The Mayor may impose and collect fees for the processing of an application for conversion and other services provided by the Mayor or the Department of Housing and Community Development to implement this chapter. The Mayor shall establish the fees by rulemaking pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

(b)

Each application for approval of a conversion shall be accompanied by payment to cover the fees, if any, prescribed pursuant to this section.

(c)

Fees collected by the Mayor pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Housing and Community Development Unified Fund, established pursuant to § 42-2857.01.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 205a
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2103, 57 DCR 6242
This section is referenced in § 42-2857.01.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2103 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).